Texas, session 892, HB45.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter C, Chapter 418, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 418.0535 to read as follows: Sec. 418.0535.  FLOODING DISASTER GUIDE. (a) The division, in collaboration with the department and the emergency management council established under Section 418.013, shall develop a guide on preparing for and responding to a flood disaster for civic, volunteer, and community organizations. (b)  The guide must provide a comprehensive approach to preparing for and responding to a flooding disaster and include information on: (1)  the impact of a flooding disaster on a community and the best practices for community engagement in response to the disaster; (2)  recommendations for minimizing casualties through volunteer presence in the disaster area; (3)  the coordination of and access to assistance resources, including trauma and support services, acute support services, long-term support services, spiritual support services, and family or victim assistance; (4)  long-term recovery and community resilience; (5)  communication coordination, including strategies to coordinate community response; (6)  training and preparation resources on flooding disaster response; and (7)  preserving and restoring community cohesion and public life after the disaster. (c)  The division shall post the guide on the division's publicly available Internet website. (d)  The division, in collaboration with the department, may seek the advice and assistance of local governments, civic organizations, volunteer organizations, and community leaders in the development and revision of the guide. SECTION 2.  Not later than April 1, 2026, the Texas Division of Emergency Management shall post on the division's publicly available Internet website a flooding disaster preparation and response guide, as required by Section 418.0535, Government Code, as added by this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.